Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8161.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 24.2
HIGHER EDUCATION OPPORTUNITIES FOR STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES ACT
16-24.2-1. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Higher Education Opportunities for
Students with Intellectual Disabilities Act.”
16-24.2-2. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide inclusive educational opportunities for a child or
student with a disability as referenced in § 16-24-1, to improve academic achievement, develop
employment and independent living skills and enhance the overall and independent learning
environments for these persons. More generally, the purpose of this chapter is to offer a further
enhanced option to students with a disability to obtain social and emotional growth, support, and
development. This chapter includes students with disabilities, severe intellectual disabilities, severe
autism spectrum disorders or other severe developmental disabilities. As used in this chapter, the
term "student with a disability" means a student who is eligible for and receives special education
services as described in § 16-24-1.
16-24.2-3. Attendance at state colleges and universities.

(a) Students with a disability who are eighteen (18) to twenty-one (21) years of age,
inclusive, and up to twenty-two (22) years of age where the provisions of § 16-24-1(f) are
applicable, who receive special education services and have disabilities including, but not limited
to, severe intellectual disabilities, severe autism spectrum disorders or other severe developmental
disabilities and are receiving special education services may also have program options including,
but not limited to, continuing education, participation in credit and noncredit courses that include
students without disabilities in an institution of higher education, development of independent
living skills, development of skills necessary for employment and development of skills to access
community services. Participation of such students in institutions of higher education under this
section shall be considered an approved expense as a special education service and shall be a benefit
available to them pursuant to the provisions of § 16-24-1. More specifically, the provision of this
chapter shall be considered a form of secondary school education; provided, however, that this
service is addressed in and provided in accordance with the student’s individualized education
program pursuant § 16-24-1.
(b) Schools for which a student may attend include all state colleges and universities,
including the Community College of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the University of
Rhode Island.
16-24.2-4. Program requirements.
(a) To ensure that students with a disability, including, but not limited to, individuals with
severe intellectual disabilities, severe autism spectrum disorders or other severe developmental
disabilities, have opportunities to be included with non-disabled students in all aspects of higher
education for the purpose of gaining academic, career, technical and independent living skills to
prepare them for adult life, including, but not limited to, employment and civic engagement, such
individuals attending a state institution of postsecondary education pursuant to this chapter shall
not be required to:
(1) Take any standardized college entrance aptitude test;
(2) Have a high school diploma or its equivalent;
(3) Meet minimum academic course requirements;
(4) Meet minimum grade point average requirements; or
(5) Obtain a passing score on any statewide assessment tests, in order to participate in
undergraduate academic courses, internships, work-based trainings, extracurricular activities that
include non-disabled students and all other aspects of campus life in accordance with this chapter.
(b)(1) State institutions of higher education, in consultation with the department of
elementary and secondary education and the office of the postsecondary commissioner, and
LC004423 - Page 2 of 7

consistent with the purposes of this chapter, may create guidelines to select students participating
in higher education pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, guidelines to determine
campus capacity and to coordinate selection of students with relevant local, state or other public
agencies serving students with severe intellectual disabilities, severe autism spectrum disorders or
other severe developmental disabilities. Provided, however, that these individuals shall not be
denied opportunities to participate in higher education solely due to their intellectual disability,
autism spectrum disorders or developmental disability.
(2) Public institutions of higher education, in consultation with the department of
elementary and secondary education and the office of the postsecondary commissioner, and
consistent with the purposes of this section, may also establish course selection guidelines to help
ensure that participating individuals receive guidance in selecting courses that are appropriate to
their individual strengths, needs, preferences and interests.
(3) Participating individuals shall be permitted to:
(i) Take a credit-bearing, undergraduate academic course for credit if they have met the
course prerequisites and requirements; or
(ii) Audit a credit-bearing, undergraduate academic course, consistent with campus policies
governing selection of students for audit participation, if they have not met the course prerequisites
and requirements.
(4) Nothing in this chapter shall require a public institution of higher education to provide
course enrollment or audit preference for students with severe intellectual disabilities, severe autism
spectrum disorders or other severe developmental disabilities, relative to other persons seeking to
enroll or audit a course. Nothing in this section shall require a public institution of higher education
to include students with severe intellectual disabilities, severe autism spectrum disorders or other
severe developmental disabilities in graduate and continuing education courses.
(c) Individuals participating in higher education pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this
section shall have access to and be included with non-disabled students in all academic and non-
academic opportunities at public institutions of higher education in order to have inclusive
educational opportunities to acquire academic, career, technical and independent living skills that
prepare them for adult life including, but not limited to, employment and civic engagement.
Individual supports and services shall be made available to support inclusion in academic courses,
extracurricular activities, and other aspects of campus life; provided, however, that nothing in this
subsection shall supersede subsections (b) and (d) of this section.
(d)(1) Public institutions of higher education shall not be required to bear the costs of
individual supports and services that exceed the kind of supports and services generally provided
LC004423 - Page 3 of 7

by public institutions of higher education.
(2) Costs associated with supporting participation in public institutions of higher education
under this section shall be:
(i) An approved expense as a special education service pursuant to § 16-24-1 and shall be
considered secondary school education; provided, however, that a student’s participation in higher
education is addressed in the student’s individualized education program under § 16-24-1 for
students ages eighteen (18) to twenty-one (21) years old, inclusive, and age twenty-two (22) years,
where applicable; provided further, that such student is considered to have a disability, a severe
intellectual disability, a severe autism spectrum disorder or other severe developmental disability;
provided further, that in the case of students who are age eighteen (18) or nineteen (19),
participation shall be limited to students with a disability, a severe intellectual disability, a severe
autism spectrum disorder or other severe developmental disability who have been unable to obtain
a passing score on any statewide assessment tests utilized as a basis for competency determination.
Provided further, that in the case of students ages twenty (20) or twenty-one (21) or twenty-two
(22) where applicable, participation shall be limited to students with a disability, a severe
intellectual disability, a severe autism spectrum disorder or other severe developmental disability
who have been unable to obtain a passing score on any statewide assessment tests utilized as a basis
for competency determinations, or who have already been determined eligible for special education
and have also been determined by the individualized education program team to have severe
functional delays impacting independent living, communication or behavioral skills resulting in
skills that are significantly below chronological age. Provided further, that nothing in this section
shall impose an additional cost on a school committee beyond the cost of what is required under
state or federal special education law. The school committee shall forward the foundation education
aid amount for the student, as determined in § 16-7.2-3, to the state college or university, and the
state college and university shall not charge the district or the student for any costs of educating the
student beyond the foundation education aid amount;
(ii) Subject to the availability of federal funding and appropriation of foundation education
aid pursuant to chapters 7, 7.1, and 7.2 of title 16, for individuals who are determined eligible for
vocational rehabilitation services. Access to higher education assists in the attainment of an
identified employment goal, as determined by the agency, consistent with all applicable regulations
and subject to the development of an individualized plan for employment;
(iii) Costs of participation may be covered by any other public or private sources available
to the student.
(e) Participating individuals under this section shall be required to follow the public
LC004423 - Page 4 of 7

institution of higher education’s student behavioral policies, including the student code of conduct,
antidiscrimination and sexual violence policies; provided, however, that the public institution of
higher education shall provide such policies in accessible formats and shall provide reasonable
accommodations for participating individuals in any process instituted thereunder.
(f) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may seek declaratory and injunctive
relief, but no school district or public institution of higher education, including trustees, officers,
administrators or employees of the school district or public institution of higher education, shall be
liable for monetary damages.
16-24.2-5. Return to public high school option.
Any student taking courses at a state college or university pursuant to this chapter shall
have the option to return to the student’s public high school, if it is found that taking courses at a
state college or university is not in the best interest of the student. If a student commences to attend
a state college or university pursuant to this chapter and subsequently returns to the high school
from the student’s sending district, the state college or university shall return to the sending district
the amount of foundation education aid related to the student, in an amount that is proportional to
the length of time the student spent attending the state college or university.
16-24.2-6. Annual reporting.
(a) Commencing September 1, 2027, and annually, not later than September 1 thereafter,
each state college or university shall file a report with the department of elementary and secondary
education, the office of the post-secondary commissioner, the board of education, and the senate
and house committees on education and on finance, regarding participation of individuals with
disabilities, severe intellectual disabilities, severe autism spectrum disorder, and other severe
developmental disabilities, who are attending state colleges and universities pursuant to this
section.
(b) The report referred to in this section shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Data detailing the number of students participating pursuant to this section each
semester, including, but not limited to, gender, race and ethnicity of the students;
(2) A list of all courses taken by participating students during the academic year, indicating
whether the students audited the course or participated in the course for credit;
(3) A list of extracurricular activities, internships, clubs and other activities in which such
students participate during the academic year;
(4) A summary of innovative strategies and practices implemented at each institution of
higher education that foster relationships with school districts, the department of human services,
and other relevant public agencies;
LC004423 - Page 5 of 7

(5) Employment data for students participating pursuant to this section obtained to the best
of the ability of institutions of higher education; and
(6) Any relevant information regarding successful outcomes or challenges the institution
experienced in the academic year.
(c) The department of elementary and secondary education and the office of the
postsecondary commissioner shall review the reports and shall take steps necessary to ensure the
institution is including individuals pursuant to this section. The reports may be used to enhance
constructive conversations between the department, office, and institutions of higher education that
contribute to developing a full understanding of best practices in implementing this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004423
========
LC004423 - Page 6 of 7